Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2613
Optometrist; diagnostic pharmaceutical agents; use; certification.

(1) An optometrist licensed in this state may use topical ocular pharmaceutical agents for diagnostic purposes authorized under subdivision (1)(b) of section 38-2605, if such person is certified by the department, with the recommendation of the board, as qualified to use topical ocular pharmaceutical agents for diagnostic purposes.

(2) Such certification shall require (a) satisfactory completion of a pharmacology course at an institution accredited by an accrediting organization which is recognized by the United States Department of Education and approved by the board and passage of an examination approved by the board or (b) evidence provided by the optometrist of certification in another state for use of diagnostic pharmaceutical agents which is deemed by the board as satisfactory validation of such qualifications.

Laws 1979, LB 9, § 5;

Laws 1986, LB 131, § 3;

Laws 1987, LB 116, § 2;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 41;

Laws 1994, LB 987, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 439;

Laws 1998, LB 369, § 5;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 96;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 50;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,135.02;

Laws 2007, LB236, § 23;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 73;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 341;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 885;

Laws 2021, LB528, § 9.